
Report on the 
dissemination Projects 
of HAQAA2

Part A
Report:  The Dissemination Projects of HAQAA2 in anglophone 
and lusophone countries written by Prof. Kethamonie Naidoo

Part B
Report: The Dissemination Projects Of HAQAA2 in 
francophone countries written by Mr. Emile Zambo Assembe



This document has been produced under a contract with the European Union (HAQAA2).

The opinions expressed are those of the contractor only and do not represent the contracting 
authority’s official position.



Report on the Dissemination 
Projects of HAQAA2

Part A:

Report On The Dissemination Projects Of Haqaa2 In Anglophone 
And Lusophone Countries By Prof. Kethamonie Naidoo



Table of contents

Executive Summary .................................................................................................................................... 5

1. Introduction ............................................................................................................................................ 6

2. Overview of the dissemination projects ................................................................................................ 6

2.1 Egypt  ................................................................................................................................................ 6

2.1.1 Context .......................................................................................................................................... 6

2.2 Kenya ................................................................................................................................................ 9

2.3 Mauritius ......................................................................................................................................... 12

2.4 Mozambique ................................................................................................................................... 15

2.5 Uganda ............................................................................................................................................ 18

2.6 Zambia ............................................................................................................................................. 20

3. Discussion of the projects ...................................................................................................................... 23

4. Conclusion .............................................................................................................................................. 24



5

Executive Summary

There were 14 projects funded that were aimed at disseminating the knowledge and skills on quality assurance 
(QA) in higher education gained during the HAQAA training program more widely in the countries of the 
participants. A brief overview of the diverse projects from Egypt, Kenya, Mauritius, Mozambique, Uganda and 
Zambia are provided in this report. It is important upon conclusion of such a continental capacity development 
initiative to consider whether the project has achieved its aims. By having each project coordinator reflect on 
the completed project in a final report and an interview, it was possible to determine whether the objectives 
set for each project were achieved. The coordinators provided information on the outcomes achieved against 
the objectives set, the organisation of the intervention, the challenges experienced and manner in which the 
risks were managed, the sustainability considerations and their recommendations for future such projects.

The main target group for the majority of the projects was the quality managers in the higher education 
institutions (HEIs) but many also included other stakeholders such as members of the regulatory bodies, 
executive management members of the HEIs and students. The most common focus was on the African 
Standards and Guidelines (ASGs) and other topics included were the African Quality Rating Mechanism 
(AQRM), the Pan African Quality Assurance Framework (PAQAF) and the Continental Education Strategy for 
Africa (CESA). Many projects included a focus on the tools and templates used for external and internal 
quality assurance.

Countries are at different levels of maturity in terms of their regulatory frameworks, infrastructure and 
implementation of quality assurance. The COVID-19 pandemic created uncertainty during the planning phase of 
the project and the six-month window period for the completion of the projects was reported to be too tight.

The HAQAA Initiative has had a significant impact on building the capacity of QA professionals and the 
dissemination has increased the reach to some institutions. However, it is evident that there is a need for 
more such training, as well as more in-depth training on specific aspects for those already trained.



6

1. Introduction

The Harmonization of Quality Assurance in Africa (HAQAA) project is a joint initiative between the African 
Union Commission (AUC) and the European Union Commission (EUC) to harmonize quality assurance across 
Africa. It is supported by the German agency, DAAD and OBREAL Global. The project commenced in 2018 
and after a successful HAQAA1 phase that focused on external quality assurance (EQA), it was followed 
by a HAQAA2 phase in 2021 that focused on internal quality assurance (IQA). In January 2022, the HAQAA 
Dissemination and Capacity Building Project was launched with a call to the graduates of the HAQAA1 and 
HAQAA2 training courses for project proposals that were related to the broader capacity development on 
quality assurance (QA).  Of the 37 project proposals submitted, 14 projects were selected for receipt of a 
maximum grant of 12 000 euros and the projects had to be completed within six months. 

The HAQAA dissemination project has been an ambitious collaboration that involved many countries across 
the African continent. 

This report provides an overview of the five projects conducted in anglophone countries and the one 
conducted in a lusophone country. They are the projects from Egypt, Kenya, Mauritius, Uganda, Zambia 
and Mozambique. The projects and contexts in which they were undertaken are diverse and they provide 
a broad array of insights. A reflection at this point will be useful in informing further HAQAA projects or 
similar future projects.

In compiling the report, the proposals and the final reports submitted for the projects were considered. 
In addition, semi-structured interviews were conducted with each of the project coordinators. The report 
focuses on the objectives, some of the highlights, insights, and aspects of the project management including 
challenges encountered and good practices that emerged as well as the outcomes achieved.

2. Overview of the dissemination projects

2.1 Egypt 

2.1.1 Context

There are approximately 60 higher education institutions (HEIs) in Egypt with a similar number of public and 
private universities. A new kind of institution that has emerged is a national public private partnership and 
this has been a good model for high technology or high demand qualifications, such as medical programmes 
following the COVID-19 pandemic. Tuition fees are low in public universities but not in private or national 
universities and the institutions vary in enrolments from between 1200 to 500 000 students. The language of 
instruction in all universities is either Arabic, English, or French based on the programs but Arabic is used for 
administration and communication between the Ministry of Higher Education and the universities. 

All HEIs are registered by the Ministry of Higher Education in terms of the Higher Education Act. After the first 
cohort of graduates is produced, the institutions could apply to the quality assurance agency, NAQAA to have 



7

their qualifications accredited.  There is a set of regulations requiring HEIs to apply for QA accreditation, but 
there is no enforcement or penalty for those who do not apply. 

2.1.2 Background

The project was entitled ASG DASPA: Dissemination for Arabic Speaking Academics and its aim was to build 
the capacity of the staff members working in the QA units at some universities in Egypt by training the QA 
members on the ASGs for QA, the HAQAA project, the AQRM that is a tool under the PAQAF and CESA. 
Although there has been a focus on QA by HEIs in the country, the use of continental standards was not 
known. The view was that by providing knowledge of the outcomes of the HAQAA projects in the Arabic 
language in an interactive environment of training would advance an understanding of the academic staff 
members on QA and the ASGs, thereby achieving a positive impact on building or strengthening a quality 
culture in their institutions.

There were 135 mainly female staff members who worked in the QA units of the universities who participated 
in the training. The proposal was submitted by the Al-Azhar University and the project coordinator was 
Professor Amany El-Sharif.   Although the ASGs are published in Arabic on the HAQAA website, this was 
insufficient to adequately acquaint the Arabic speaking QA staff members on the ASGs and its purposes. 
The workshops were intended to address the need for face-to-face training using an interactive approach to 
disseminate and promote the adoption of the ASGs by academics and QA units more effectively. 

2.1.3 Objectives

Three objectives were set for these workshops. They were to:

I. Support the dissemination, promotion, and utilisation of the outcomes of the HAQAA activities by 
Arabic speaking academic staff members

II. Disseminate the ASG-QA as a tool for institutional self-assessment/preparing for accreditation 

III. Build quality cultures in HEIs through the training of staff members from the QA units

2.1.4 Organisation

There were a number of activities that needed to be completed prior to the workshops. Among them 
were the designing of the training materials in Arabic which involved translation services; to establish a 
learning management system (LMS) and then to upload the designed training material onto the LMS; to 
visit the different universities to invite them to the workshops; to publish certificates of participations 
with the logos of the HAQAA Initiative’ strategic partners and coordinators; and to assign staff members 
to the organisational activities such as translation, project logistics, communications, and graphic content 
development of training materials.



8

The people involved in the organisational tasks included the project coordinator, information technology 
personnel, translators, administration staff and an international QA expert who reviewed the material.

2.1.5 Risk management

The proposal was submitted during the time of the COVID-19 pandemic which prohibited physical training 
events. The primary concern therefore was whether face- to -face physical workshops would be permissible. 
This risk was mitigated by the preparations made to be ready to shift to an on-line mode at short notice. 
Fortunately, this was not necessary as the restrictions were lifted by the time of the workshops and the on-
line platform was made available to participants who were unable to physically attend the workshops.

2.1.6 Challenges

There was limited time for the project to be implemented after the grant had been awarded and the 
activities had to be completed within six months. Many of the complex activities had to be completed prior 
to commencement of the workshops, such converting the translated materials into training materials and 
setting up a learning management system (LMS).  This was further complicated by the timing of the project as 
the workshops were to take place during the period of final examinations and the summer vacation, and this 
affected the number of participants available to participate in the face-to-face engagements, although the 
number of participants exceeded the target participation rate.

Some staff members reported having a busy work schedule at this time of the year and they could not attend 
the physical event which would have been preferable but were able to join the training online.

Another challenge was that the budget had been underestimated. Translation services and translation 
software, print outs, taxes and meals during training had to be covered for participants from distant cities 
within the budget limit. 

2.1.7 Sustainability

The availability of the customised training modules in Arabic on the locally designed LMS ensured sustainability 
of the dissemination by increasing the accessibility of the programme and materials to current participants 
and future academic and administrative staff members in the QA units who would need to understand and 
use the ASGs. Further, the link of the LMS of this project to HAQAA website enhanced the visibility and 
sustainable usage of the material. Another sustainability measure was to upload training sessions onto the  
YouTube channel.

2.1.8 Outcomes

An important outcome was that workshop participants acquired a common language and frame of reference 
for IQA based on the ASGs, as well as a better understanding of the purpose of the HAQAA Initiative and its 



9

capacity development initiatives. Another significant outcome was the design and production of training 
material in Arabic developed for the academic staff. This development also enabled customisation of the 
of the resource material to the Egyptian context. The establishment of an LMS for resources of the HAQAA 
published tools in Arabic is an important outcome as this will enhance sustainability of the utilisation of the 
resources. The videos of the materials were also available in Arabic.  A further outcome was the creation of a 
database for Arabic speaking academics in the field of QA.

Harmonisation of quality assurance across Africa requires inclusivity of all languages so this project has 
contributed to this goal of HAQAA by producing the documentation and training material in the Arabic 
language in an easily accessible format that could be used by other Arabic speaking university staff members 
across the continent.

2.1.9 Recommendations

The HAQAA Initiative activities need to be inclusive for all language groups across Africa, viz., English, French, 
Portuguese and Arabic.  Further, there should be more time allocated for the projects so that there is sufficient 
time to reach more university staff members with such training.

2.2 Kenya

2.2.1 Context

The HAQAA dissemination project in Kenya was managed by the Commission for University Education (CUE) 
which is the Quality Assurance Agency (QAA) in Kenya. The CUE regulates the 77 universities in the country, 
the majority being public and a few private. There is a broad distribution of institutions with a university 
in every region and also a specialized University of Defense. The enrolments in the large universities range 
from 30 000 – 70 000 students and there are also some smaller HEIs. From 2012, all universities had to be 
accredited and then audited after five years. New programmes also needed to be accredited.

2.2.2 Project Background

The dissemination project in Kenya was to build the capacity of members of the CUE and the QA directors from 
higher education institutions (HEIs). The aim was to develop and apply quality assurance tools for accreditation 
and the monitor open, distance and e-learning (ODeL) centers and academic programs in universities. The CUE 
had previously developed a self-assessment questionnaire (SAQ) for ODeL institutions and programs but the 
self-assessment reports (SARs) submitted by the universities indicated a need for improved self-assessment 
and reporting skills. There was an indication that the existing universities’ standards and guidelines (2014) for 
ODeL for HEIs that had been developed were not being effectively utilized. Therefore, one of the aims of this 
project was to identify the reasons for the sub-optimal application of the previously developed SAQ and t19o 
promote the alignment of a revised instrument to the ASG-QA and the AQRM as tools for self-assessment and 
accreditation of ODeL academic programs and institutions. 



10

The project entailed workshops for the CUE staff members to develop and revise the evaluation and self-
assessment tools for the accreditation and monitoring of ODeL programs and HEIs. Thereafter a capacity 
development workshop was conducted for the quality assurance directors from HEIs in Kenya. The aim was 
to improve the quality of the self-assessment reporting by HEIs and to harmonize the evaluation and self-
assessment tools for ODeL by aligning them with the ASG-QA and the AQRM. This would also then lead to 
the promotion of the ASG-QA and the AQRM and their incorporation into the tools for EQA and IQA in Kenya.

2.2.3 Objectives

Four specific objectives were set for this project, viz. to:

I. Develop evaluation tools for the accreditation of ODeL academic programs and institutions that were 
aligned to the ASG-QA and the AQRM;

II. Review the SAQ for ODeL academic programs and institutions, and to align them to the ASG-QA and 
the AQRM;

III. Develop an evaluation tool for the self-assessment report for ODeL academic programs and 
institutions for use by peer reviewers/experts; and

IV. Train directors of QA from the HEIs on the preparation of the SARs and the accreditation of ODeL 
academic programs and institutions

2.2.4 Organisation

The project coordinator was Dr Beatrice Odera- Kwach and a project team was constituted to include the 
key role-players from the CUE such as the Heads of Planning, Accreditation and Libraries. Three activities 
that took place were the sensitization meetings for the staff members from the CUE, working retreats for 
the CUE staff members and the participation of five experts for the development of evaluation and self-
assessment tools. 

The systematic process undertaken to identify that the SAQ improvements needed is noteworthy. Of the 77 
HEIs that should have submitted their reports, 37 institutions did so, and some reports had to be returned to 
the institutions for improvement. An in-depth analysis of six reports and physical verification of the practices 
at the institutions indicated that the reporting was inaccurate, and the conclusion was that one of the 
reasons for this was that the items in the SAQ were unclear and that improvements to the instrument were 
needed. The analysis revealed gaps in the phrasing and understanding of the content, especially in the areas 
of technology infrastructure and media, student and staff support, and assessment. In addition, there were 
gaps in understanding the principles and practices of self-assessment. The gap analysis report was reviewed 
by experts in the various thematic areas and modifications were suggested in specific areas of the SAQ, and 
it was aligned to the ASG-QA and the AQRM. The revised SAQ has been internally approved by the CUE and 
will be gazetted soon.



11

The major event was a capacity development workshop for the directors of QA from the HEIs and CUE staff 
members. A total of 37 people participated in the capacity development workshop on the preparation of 
the SARs and the accreditation of ODeL academic programs and institutions. This involved 29 directors of 
QA, Registrars, peer experts and six CUE staff members. The workshop included a discussion on the HAQAA 
initiative, ODeL standards in the university standards and guidelines (2014), and evaluation criteria for ODeL 
institutions and centres. Participants shared their experiences in offering ODeL programs and the engagement 
between the CUE staff members and the HEIs on the accreditation of ODeL institutions and academic programs 
enhanced the training.

An evaluation tool for use by peer reviewers and experts during the accreditation of ODeL institutions and 
academic programs was also developed and this was thereafter validated by the peer reviewers. Training on 
the use of this evaluation instrument will need to be done for the peer evaluators and the CUE staff members.

2.2.5 Risk Management

Some of the risks anticipated were that the budget could be insufficient as the costs of the conference 
facilities at the time of the workshops were uncertain, that there could be conflicting activities between 
the CUE and HEI’s schedules that could affect the planned project activities. Further, if there was a delay in 
the development of the tools, it could result in a delay of the training workshop. The way these risks were 
mitigated included having a budget plan, incorporating the project activities into the CUE workplan during 
the project, and closely monitoring the costs and evaluating the progress on the development of the tools.

2.2.6 Challenges

Despite the steps taken to mitigate the identified potential risks, some of the project activities conflicted with 
the activities in CUE’s annual workplan and this led to postponements and delays in the implementation of 
activities as set out in the project timelines. Limitations in funding of the CUE led to a revision of the project 
activities and a reduction in the number of QA staff members and HEI staff members who were trained in ODeL. 
The anticipated additional funding from the CUE that was to supplement the grant was not received due to 
budgetary constraints of the CUE due to the reprioritization of funding by government for Covid related expenses. 
There was a high demand for attendance of the workshop by the QA directors who were not accommodated.

2.2.7 Sustainability

The CUE took the two documents produced from the project through its internal approval system which 
enhanced ownership and commitment for implementation. There is a plan to have an annual QA forum on 
ODeL to increase dialogue on QA for ODeL that would involve the CUE staff members and the directors of 
QA at the HEI’s. The aim is for the institutionalization of ODeL and a regular review of the developed quality 
assurance tools in the higher education sector. The plan is also to have the SAQ automated and the CUE will 
incorporate the HAQAA activities into its core activities to monitor developments in QA and to harmonize its 
evaluation tools for ODeL.



12

2.2.8 Outcomes

There are several achievements reported from the project. The project team analyzed the use of the SAQ for 
the universities which entailed a content analysis of the responses submitted by the universities in their SARs 
and the criteria set for the SAQ tool and revised them. The revised SAR document was renamed Guidelines 
for Preparing a Self-Assessment Report for an ODeL Centre in Kenya. It is awaiting the internal approval by the 
CUE before it can be implemented. 

The project team developed a training program for the preparation of the SARs and accreditation for ODeL 
academic programs and institutions, and invited directors of ODeL from HEIs for the training. Due to budgetary 
constraints, only 37 of the 77 directors were trained. They are expected to have a better common understanding 
of the Kenyan universities’ standards and guidelines and their nexus with regional and continental standards 
such as the ASG-QA and AQRM as tools for harmonized QA. This means an increase in the pool of trained QA 
peers who would be able to cascade the understandings gained to universities and to serve as peer evaluators 
and reviewers for the QAA. The development of an evaluation tool for the accreditation of ODeL institutions 
was another significant achievement. Further, the IQA and EQA mechanisms for HEIs in Kenya on ODeL is 
likely to improve because of this project. In addition, a holistic approach to QA and accreditation of ODeL 
programs and institutions in Kenya that is aligned to the AQRM has been made possible, and there is a wider 
appreciation and acceptance of ODeL in Kenya.

The project has been completed within a realigned budget and scope after the anticipated additional funding 
from the CUE was not received. The overall objective of strengthening the capacity of the CUE and HEIs in 
Kenya for enhanced quality of ODeL was achieved.

2.2.9 Recommendations

The analysis of the SARs has proved to be a useful method to identify the capacity development needs 
of HEIs, to critically examine and revise the tools and to provide clarity where necessary with respect to 
institutional and program accreditation for ODEL.  The project activities had already been mainstreamed 
into the institutional predetermined work plans and this facilitated the rollout of the project.  This is a good 
practice model that will be adopted for future such projects. It is also recommended that there should be 
more frequent forums on ODeL.

2.3 Mauritius

2.3.1 Context

Higher education in Mauritius is governed by the Higher Education Act (HEA), the Higher Education 
Commission (HEC) has oversight responsibility for higher education, and the Quality Assurance Association 
(QAA) is responsible for quality assurance. There is also the Mauritian Qualifications Authority (MQA) that 
manages the National Qualifications Framework. The HEC and QAA are fairly new structures, emanating from 
the former Tertiary Education Commission (TEC) of 1988, following the promulgation of the HEA in 2017 and 



13

therefore the management of quality assurance at a national level is in a transition phase. HEIs are audited 

about every five years and the programmes need to be accredited.

There are four public universities, each governed by its own Act as well as private institutions and specialized 
universities, such as the Academy of Design and Innovation. At a national level, Mauritius is focused on 
strengthening the quality assurance system of its higher education sector. 

2.3.2  Background

The dissemination project proposed by Mauritius was a five-day capacity development workshop entitled 
Capacity Building for a Shared Understanding of IQA Systems Based on the ASG-QA in Mauritian HEIs. A joint 
project proposal was developed by three public universities for the capacity-building activity on IQA and EQA 
for stakeholders operating at different levels and functions in the HEIs in Mauritius.  The joint submission 
was made by the University of Technology, Mauritius (UTM), Open University of Mauritius (OUM) and the 
University of Mauritius (UOM). The Head of Quality of the Université des Mascareignes (UDM) and the Head 
of Quality Assurance of the Mahatma Gandhi Institute (MGI) were also invited to provide their inputs to the 

project proposal. 

The topic selected for the workshop addressed the common need expressed by the three institutions to 
probe further the selected ASG-QA standards and for participants to acquire a deeper understanding of the 
standards. The view was that enhanced training is essential to build the skills and knowledge necessary to 
develop a robust IQA system that is aligned with the EQA requirements for Mauritius. 

2.3.3 Objectives

The workshop aimed to develop a shared understanding of the ASGs and their relationship to the EQA 
standards of Mauritius. The ASG’s would assist universities streamline the standards they use for IQA and to 
align these to the EQA requirements and the ASGs, thereby promoting the continuous improvement of the 
IQA systems of universities.  

The specific objectives of the workshop were to:

I. Guide participants to apply the available standards and guidelines effectively at national and 
regional levels

II. Strengthen the assessment practices of stakeholders of their quality through regular internal quality 
audits/self-assessments 

III. Promote quality improvement and enhancement through external peer reviews, continuous 
monitoring of quality and the sharing of good practices

IV. Support the achievement of quality standards at academic and administrative levels through 
continuous training of relevant staff members in order to promote a quality culture within institutions



14

2.3.4 Organisation

Mr Devarajen Venethethan, Head of Quality Assurance of the University of Technology was the project 
coordinator and the chairperson of the project committee. The project committee met several times through 
face-to-face and online meetings to finalize the arrangements and program for the workshop. 

A conference website constructed by UTM provided easy access to information about the event. The venue 
selected was in the centre of the island, and therefore easily accessible to all participants so they could travel 
daily, and accommodation costs were saved. An international QA specialist was selected as the resource 
person to facilitate the workshop. 

The project received high prominence at national level with the opening ceremony addressed by the Minister 
of Education and other dignitaries, and news of this training was covered on national television. 

The workshop program commenced with an overview of the QA terrain in higher education, with particular 
emphasis on the continental initiatives through the HAQAA Initiative and the EQA context of Mauritius. The 
main focus of the workshop was on strengthening the IQA system and the integrated quality management 
system (IQMS) of universities. This included a discussion of commonly used terminology. Each of the first 
four days of the workshop focused on one or more of the ASG 7 – 12 standards and guidelines and included 
an interactive group session on the practical application of the standard/s and guidelines discussed. At the 
beginning of the workshop, groups were assigned a task to create a poster that reinforced the aspects covered 
in the workshop. The group posters were presented on the fifth day of the workshop.

The profile of the academic and administrative staff members from the six participating public HEIs and the 
six private universities was stipulated. They had to be directly involved in leading and managing the IQA and 
EQA audits at the institution, be responsible for or be the QA representative of Departments/Schools and 
provide input to the QA Unit for the Self-Evaluation Report (SER.) In addition, one student representative 
was invited from each public institution to provide the student perspective on quality assurance in higher 
education institutions. More students would have been invited had the budget permitted this.

The regulators, i.e., the HEC, QAA and MQA were invited to participate in the five-day conference as they 
were considered important stakeholders.

2.3.5 Risk management

The COVID -19 pandemic restrictions were in place when the project proposal was formulated. This made the 
plan to bring an international facilitator and many participants to a physical meeting a risk, so the contingency 
arrangement was to have an online conference. Fortunately, the restrictions were lifted prior to the workshop 
and a physical event was held.  

2.3.6 Challenges

A serious challenge was the financing of the workshop. All payments had to be made upfront, but OBREAL 
Global provided 80% of the budget so obtaining the remaining 20% prior to the event was huge challenge 



15

and a source of anxiety. The UTM finally provided the required amount in due time. Another budget related 
challenge was that only six students could be invited from the public universities as there was insufficient 
money to invite more students.

The website sub-project had not been budgeted for but was sponsored by the UTM.  

2.3.7 Sustainability

The website will remain as a testimony to this project and the resources made available and discussed during 
the workshop will be available to the public. 

During the closing session of the workshop, the idea was mooted for a QA forum. It is commendable that the 
Higher Education Quality Society (HEQAS) has already been established and membership is open to officers/
students of higher education institutions, post-secondary education and vocational/training institutions in 
Mauritius that have an interest in QA. It is also noteworthy that a member of the QAA is an office bearer of 
the society indicating the support of the regulator and its support of this QA community initiative.

2.3.8 Outcomes

The outcomes for the workshop were met in that participants indicated their greater understanding of IQA, 
EQA and the ASGs. A tool for programme review was provided that would improve the quality of the evidence-
based self-evaluation reports, if effectively used.

At the end of the workshop, the participants were requested to complete an online feedback form. The 
feedback was anonymous, and participants’ responses were positive. Participants indicated that they found 
the sessions to be practical and instructive. The duration of the conference was found to be appropriate, 
and participants indicated looking forward to follow-up events and wider dissemination. To facilitate this 
process a WhatsApp group named the QA Practitioner’s Forum was set up end the participants of the 
workshop were invited to join to share their concerns and queries on QA matters and get responses from 
other participants.

2.3.8 Recommendations 

Participants recommended that more regular workshops be held. There was also a need expressed for 
practical examples of the application of the standards in a review.

2.4 Mozambique

2.4.1 Context

There are approximately 56 HEIs in Mozambique consisting of both public and private institutions, and 
with many of the universities existing for less than 20 years. For example, the Pedagogic University was 
restructured into five new universities. Most universities offer undergraduate degrees, with only a few that 



16

offer postgraduate qualifications at the Master’s and Doctoral levels. There is strong collaboration between 
the national quality assurance agency, CNAQ and the universities, with every university having a QA unit.

Prior to an external quality review, there is a self-assessment commission (SAC) set up within the university to 
conduct an internal quality review.

2.4.2 Background

The title of the dissemination project of Mozambique was Building the Culture of Quality and the QA system in 
Universities. The project was a joint submission by the Universidade Rovuma and the Universidade Licungo, and the 
partner institution was CNAQ.  The project coordinators were Dulce João Nunes Langa and Geraldo Vernijo Deixa. 

Managers of quality departments from universities from all regions of the country were invited. There was a 
good response to the workshop invitation and approximately 200 people attended the event either in person 
or online. Participants included members of project teams, QA managers, members of the National Council 
for Evaluation, quality course directors and self-evaluation committee members as well as HEI managers who 
showed an interest in participating in the workshops.

2.4.3 Organization

The project was organized by a small project team and consisted of various capacity development activities. 
Following the launch of the project, a capacity building workshop was held for QA managers. The intention was 
to include QA managers from as many universities as possible and this was achieved by having the workshop 
open to participants in face-to-face and online modes. Thereafter, the course directors and members of the 
self-assessment teams of the two universities that submitted the proposal were trained and the training 
included the following four aspects:

• African Quality Rating Mechanisms for Institutional Improvement

• Political Framework - Towards a Harmonized Higher Education Area on the African Continent

• Internal Quality Assurance in Higher Education Institutions

• Evaluation as an Integral Part of Quality Assurance

A seminar was held following the training workshops to close the project. This activity provided an opportunity 
for the project team members to meet and critically analyse the management and outcomes of the project.

2.4.4 Risk Management

The biggest risk was the insufficiency of funds for travel and a subsistence allowance for those having to 
monitor universities’ readiness for the external review, following the training.



17

2.4.6 Challenges

Organising the project with members of the project team working at a distance was difficult at times as there 
were different tasks to be assigned and coordinated, such as procurement, writing reports and information 
technology responsibilities.  There was a small team set up at each participating university to manage 
the finances and reporting. However, it was not possible to include all the national HEIs in the project’s 
dissemination and capacity building event.

Further, the delays in receiving the funds due to bureaucratic errors were the cause of anxiety. The universities 
and CNAQ provided the additional necessary funding and marketing of the events.

2.4.7 Sustainability

The team is willing and would like to continue the training both in their universities and other HEIs 
as it is relevant to further boost the culture of quality within the institutions. An idea is to establish 
regional QA networks in order to involve more universities. The point was made that creating a culture 
of quality takes time and therefore expanding the training and encouraging collaboration among 
universities, e.g., on curriculum design would strengthen the quality culture. There is also the idea of 
requesting the QA managers who were trained to replicate the training in their own university and/or 
other universities.

Many people have expressed interest in having a formal qualification in quality assurance and therefore the 
possibility of designing a postgraduate diploma or a Master’s programme on quality assurance, and even 
some short courses is being explored.

2.4.8 Outcomes

This was a high-profile national QA project which was attended by the President of the national quality 
assurance body (CNAQ) in Mozambique who praised the initiative. It was a successful project that has had 
a positive impact as most of the national higher education institutions in the country participated in the 
training workshops. The quality managers had the opportunity to share good practices, challenges and QA 
experiences with the group and a network of QA managers has been created through the project. Importantly, 
there has been a raising of awareness on quality issues as the training of different levels of the university 
management created a link between the executive management and the QA managers.

The project coordinators believe that the impact of the project has been far greater than reported because 
each manager who attended the training was required to replicate the training within their institutions. 
Following the workshops, the project coordinators are receiving invitations to train the quality managers 
from other universities who were not invited to or who did not attend the workshop.



18

2.4.9 Recommendations

The one recommendation is to improve the funding arrangements so that there are no delays in the receipt 
of the funds to avoid this adversely affecting the progress of the project.

2.5 Uganda

2.5.1 Context

There are about 32 HEIs which include both public and private institutions, and chartered and unchartered 
HEIs distributed across the regions. The Ministry of Education and Sports oversees education at all levels 
and determines the institutional charter status. The Uganda National Council for Higher Education (NCHE) 
is responsible for accrediting all HEIs and programmes at the end of every cycle which could range from five 
to seven years. HEIs are required to do a stakeholder engagement and consultation with professional bodies 
during program development or program review. Evidence of this activity is a requirement for accreditation.

The Uganda University Quality Assurance Forum (UUQAF) is a registered non-profit organisation for QA managers and 
practitioners which organises capacity development workshops and offers advice and support. Members meet physically 
three to four times a year and actively interact through a Whats App group and a website. Members of the UUQAF are 
also members of the regional forum, the East African Quality Assurance.

2.5.2 Background

Since 2017 members of the Uganda Universities Quality Assurance Forum (UUQAF) have participated in 
HAQAA Initiative. The dissemination project planned was to disseminate the learnings to other QA managers 
in the country.  The topics for dissemination included the ASG-QA, the AQRM and the HAQAA Initative. The 
project also included a benchmarking activity and policy dialogue and aimed at expanding the understanding 
and application of the continental QA systems and standards across the Ugandan higher education sector. 
The intention was to have the trained QA managers align their own standards and guidelines used at their 
universities to the continental ASGs. The project was led by Dr Richard Ouma, the Higher Education Officer 
at the National Council for Higher Education (NCHE) and Ms Elizabeth Birabwa from the Busitema University.

2.5.3 Objectives

The objectives of the QA training workshops with the QA managers were to:

I. Increase their awareness, understanding, and appreciation of IQA systems, ASG-QA and the AQRM

II. Enable them to develop relevant instruments for assessing IQA systems and procedures in terms of 
the AQRM

III. Build their capacity to evaluate IQA systems and procedures in their HEIs and other HEIs in Uganda



19

IV. Empower them to design appropriate IQA policies and procedures for their HEIs

V. Enable them to benchmark their IQMS with that of Ndejje University that participated in the initial 
study that operationalised the AQRM 

VI. Equip them with competencies to initiate and implement sustainable IQA systems, and develop 
institutional reports after reflecting on knowledge and skills gained from awareness training workshop 
and the benchmarking activities in HEIs in Uganda

2.5.4 Organization 

This training of the HAQAA2 dissemination projects was organized and funded by the Ugandan Universities 
Quality Assurance Forum (UUQAF), in partnership with OBREAL GLOBAL, and the European Association for Quality 
Assurance in Higher Education. It was conducted by both national and international QA experts who engaged the 
trainees in the national, regional (East African) and international (European Higher Education Area) QA frameworks. 
Two on-site awareness/sensitization training workshops were conducted and these were supplemented by an 
online workshop for monitoring purposes. The workshops consisted of presentations by experts, open discussions, 
sharing of experiences by participants and policy dialogue sessions in which the experts participated. The ASG-
QA was comprehensively covered in the workshop, with a particular focus on IQA. The AQRM was also included 
in the training program as well as a policy dialogue on aligning national standards to continental standards. A 
benchmarking visit was undertaken to Ndejje University as part of the first three-day workshop. Further, a project 
evaluation tool was developed to assess the level of attainment of the learning outcomes. The participants were 
also required to develop institutional reports relating to the sensitisation workshop proceedings and the planned 
institutional action plan to align their institutional standards and guidelines to the ASGs. 

During the monitoring workshop that was conducted online, participants’ progress on their institutional 
reports and plans were discussed, and clarification, advice and support were provided.

2.5.5 Risk Management

The organisers were aware that post the COVID-19 pandemic, universities in the country followed different 
academic calendars and therefore some members would not be able to attend on the set dates for the 
workshops. Another risk identified was that the attendance of the potential participants could be affected by 
universities not having sufficient funds to cover their travel costs.

2.5.6 Challenges

The timing of the workshops in the last quarter presented the challenge of not all participants being available 
to attend. Therefore, participants who attended the first workshop did not necessarily attend the second one 
and instead sent other people in their places.

There is also a high turnover of QA staff members and so by the time of the last workshop, some members 
had moved to new positions both inside and outside of the institutions.



20

The way in which this challenge was addressed was to share the training material and videos on the Forum’s 
website with new members and those who missed the training.

2.5.7 Sustainability

Sustainability was ensured by having the workshop attended by the QA managers, academic registrars and lecturers 
to ensure continuity. The main aim was to share the knowledge gained with others in the institutions and this was 
achieved through the organization of faculty QA dissemination workshops, planning of IQA self-assessments based 
on the AQRM and implementation of the ASG-QA and the AQRM. Another plan was to increase awareness and 
sensitisation about QA through the Uganda Vice Chancellors Forum and for the QA departments in universities to 
work in close collaboration with the Vice Chancellors to ensure support for the activities.

2.5.8 Outcomes

All workshop outcomes were achieved, although the last workshop had to be completed outside of the project 
timeframe due to financial constraints. In the institutional reports, participants demonstrated awareness and 
understanding of IQA systems, ASG-QA and the AQRM. They indicated that they would be reviewing the 
standards and guidelines used at their universities and aligning them to the ASGs. However, participants 
indicated that there were very few significant differences between the standards and guidelines they used 
and those stated in the ASGs. ASG standards 9, 10 and 13 were those from which most information was used 
to strengthen the Ugandan standards. They also reported feeling more confident to evaluate the IQA systems 
and procedures and to design appropriate IQA policies, as well as to benchmark their IQMS against that of 
Ndejje university.

2.5.9 Recommendations

For Uganda, it would be easier to implement such projects in the first quarter of the year because the last 
quarter is extremely busy with examinations and graduations.

2.6 Zambia

2.6.1 Context

There are approximately 62 registered universities in Zambia which includes nine public and 53 private 
universities.

The Higher Education Authority (HEA) is the main regulator of HEIs in Zambia. It is responsible for the 
registration of HEIs as well as the registration and accreditation of learning programmes. However, the 
registration and accreditation of qualifications which come from these learning programmes is done by the 
Zambia Qualifications Authority (ZAQA). 



21

The institutional capacity to offer programmes is checked by the HEA and there are also spot checks done to 
check conformity to standards. Institutions are graded into tiers based on their capacity to offer various levels 
of qualifications. For example, Tier 1 institutions would be permitted to offer doctoral degrees and would 
need to demonstrate that they have an adequate number of appropriately qualified staff. There are also a 
number of professional bodies that have legislative authority and oversight over professional qualifications 
offered by the universities for example the Nurses and Midwifery Council of Zambia (NMCZ) and the Health 
Professionals Council of Zambia (HPCZ) are in charge or regulating health related programmes before the 
HEA considers the program for accreditation. This means that before an HEI can submit its health program for 
registration with HEA, HPCZ and or NMCZ will first have to approve that program, only then can an HEI send 
it to HEA for registration. EQA is a peer driven system.

2.6.2 Background

The dissemination project of Zambia comprised of a three-day workshop for staff members at various levels 
who are stakeholders in QA at the universities. The proposal was submitted by the University of Lusaka and 
the project coordinator was Mr Oscar Mwale, a participant of HAQAA2.

A total of 45 participants included QA officers, a CEO, vice-chancellors, deputy vice- chancellors, registrars and 
deputy registrars, deans, lecturers and five administrative staff from public and private universities. The ZAQA 
was invited to the workshop and would have participated but it was hosting a workshop during the same period. 
The Higher Education Authority (HEA) and Ms Sarah Lang from DAAD participated in the opening ceremony.

2.6.3 Objectives

The main aim of the workshop was to increase participants understanding of IQA and the objectives were to:

I. Build capacity for QA evaluation, project management and program development

II. Create a network of quality assurance officers to collaborate and share ideas

III. Raise awareness about the HAQAA project and PAQAF

IV. Contextualize quality assurance activities and functions to the Zambian higher education environment

2.6.4 Organization

A committee was established to plan and organize a three - day workshop. Tasks and responsibilities were 
distributed among the members, and they played an important role in planning the activities and implementing 
them. There was a large amount of work to be done prior to the workshop and this included the designing 
and preparation of materials such as invitation letters, certificates, banners, and customized folders. External 
facilitators were invited, presentations were developed, and the venue was prepared. 

The sessions of the workshop included IQA, IQA evaluation, project management and program development.



22

2.6.5 Risk management

The main risk was the uncertainty about whether it would be possible to run a physical workshop due to the 
COVID- 19 restrictions. Fortunately, all restrictions were lifted by the time of the workshop.

2.6.6 Challenges

The volatility in the value of the Zambian kwacha had a negative effect on the financial management as 
its strengthening resulted in decreased funds for the project. This was exacerbated by the organizers not 
including the taxes to be paid in the budget submitted for the grant. It was fortunate that money had been 
set aside for contingency costs.

Another challenge was that the project had to be completed within a short space of time. 

2.6.7 Sustainability

Although this was a single activity, the QA managers are using this network as a platform to raise issues that 
are affecting their institutions and they receive assistance from other institutions that have experience and 
expertise in these areas.

QA is a fairly new concept in the country and many of the QA managers have not been trained so this workshop 
covered a broad range of issues. The plan is to have more training on specific issues that are identified as 
needs by the institutions.

2.6.8 Outcomes

The participants’ understanding of IQA increased and the University of Lusaka has been able to offer support 
to other universities. There has been increased collaboration between the departments of the universities 
with their quality assurance departments. The University of Lusaka has agreed to appoint a staff member 
from the HEA to teach on its Postgraduate Diploma in Quality Assurance program to include the perspective 
of the regulators. Overall, there has been an increased understanding of QA initiatives at the continental level 
and of PAQAF.

2.6.9 Recommendations

Better planning of the dates for future workshops would increase participation. In the case of this workshop, 
the colleagues from ZAQA and some colleagues from the universities could not attend because they needed 
to attend the workshop that was organized by ZAQA.

Capacity building projects such as this one should continue as trends in QA keep improving on a daily basis. 
QA personnel need to keep developing their knowledge and skills in institutional QA so the institutions are 
kept abreast with current processes, procedures and policies on the management of QA in HEIs. 



23

3. Discussion of the projects

The six projects reported on are different from each other and are undertaken in diverse contexts but some 
themes that emerged are briefly discussed. Among the differences are the levels of QA maturity, the regulatory 
environments, voluntary and compulsory programme accreditation, qualification types, qualification awarding 
and non-awarding status, enrolment sizes, fee paying and free HEIs, and the mix in institutional types such as 
private and public HEIs, specialised universities and international institutions.

Despite the uncertainty caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, all projects were successful in that they were 
executed according to plan and achieved their purpose in disseminating the knowledge about the continental 
QA initiatives more broadly within their countries and HEIs. Fortunately, Covid restrictions relating to physical 
events were lifted by the time of the workshops and therefore the preferred mode of physical workshops 
which enhanced dissemination was possible. Although there were project teams set up, it was mainly due 
to the commitment and drive of the project coordinators who were graduates of the HAQAA Initiative and in 
some cases one or two of their colleagues who ensured that the projects were implemented and completed. 
This clearly demonstrated that these project coordinators had served as ambassadors for the HAQAA Initiative 
in their countries, which was one of the aims of the HAQAA Initiative. The universities to which these project 
coordinators belonged also played an important supportive role, such as providing additional funding and 
technical expertise to set up websites and an LMS system. 

In some countries the events received national prominence and prestige. Examples of this were the attendance 
by ministers of education, vice-chancellors and directors of QAA’s at opening ceremonies and even coverage 
of the event on national television. There was also participation of staff members of the higher education and 
quality assurance regulatory bodies as well as students which enhanced the discussions in the workshops. 
The main target group was the QA managers from institutions and the one common topic was training on 
the ASGs and to a lesser extent, on the AQRM. The virtual participation of a member of the implementing 
consortium of the HAQAA2 Initiative (Ms Sarah Lang from DAAD) in the opening and closing ceremonies was 
acknowledged with appreciation by the project coordinators.

Noteworthy was the review in some projects of the instruments and templates used for EQA and IQA and a 
refinement of them to improve clarity and guidance for the institutional users. This signals the need for the 
QA managers in the institutions and national QA agencies to critically examine, and improve where necessary, 
the quality of their communication, practices and instruments used.

The unintended positive consequences of the dissemination projects were the frequent creation of a network 
of QA practitioners. In some cases, they were organized into formal groupings such as a Whats App group or a 
formal society. There were also the informal networks which resulted in members reaching out to each other 
for further training and support. In the evaluation of the projects, all of which were positive, the knowledge, 
understandings and insights gained from participants’ interaction with each other was specifically mentioned 
as a positive outcome of the training workshops.

There were a few common recommendations made for future projects of this kind. The timeframe of six 
months that was allocated for completion of the projects was a challenge for many institutions and the 



24

recommendation was that more time needed to be given for organizing and implementing the projects. 
For example, the calendar of one country was different in that the project had to be implemented over the 
period of the final examinations and the commencement of the summer vacation. The projects also differed 
in nature as some involved more complex organizational tasks that had to be completed prior to the actual 
training, such as the creation of an LMS.

Students are important stakeholders in higher education QA and their inclusion in a few workshops is indicative 
of good practice.  Inclusivity in terms of language is an integral component of harmonizing quality assurance 
across Africa. English and French are the dominant languages and in the future it needs to be ensured that 
Portuguese and Arabic are given equitable attention for projects and resources.

4. Conclusion

The dissemination projects have proved highly effective in disseminating the knowledge, skills, attitudes and values 
that underpinned the EQA and IQA capacity development projects of HAQAA1 and HAQAA2. There is evidence of 
collaboration, support, networking, information sharing and innovative practices in the various reports.

The HAQAA Initiative consisting of a first and second phase followed by a call for dissemination projects has 
proven to be a successful useful model to be considered for future similar projects. A limited number of QA 
practitioners could be trained during the two phases of the HAQAA Initiative and therefore the dissemination 
project is an effective and efficient mechanism for cascading QA capacity development throughout the higher 
education sector. However, reports from the dissemination projects indicate that wider dissemination is still 
needed and that there is also a need for more in-depth, specialized and focused QA training and development.  
Aspects such as open distance and e-learning (OdeL) and compiling self-assessment/reflection reports 
are examples of more specialized aspects of training.  There is also further discussion needed on common 
terminology, such as the terms audit and accreditation that are applied differently in some countries, if 
harmonization of QA across Africa is to become a reality. 

Conclusion

It should be noted that the projects were conceptualized during the period of the COVID-19 pandemic which 
had devastating consequences for countries, institutions and individuals and which gave rise to uncertainty 
about their implementation. 

The HAQAA Initiative has been the catalyst for a continental QA movement which needs to be strengthened going 
forward. The question then is whether to build on the capacity of those who participated in the first two phases of the 
HAQAA Initiative or to expand the training to a new cohort in a possible future phase of HAQAA. There could also be 
consideration of a combination of the two approaches. Whatever the decision is for the future of the Initiative, it would 
be beneficial if the valuable resources from the HAQAA1, HAQAA2 and the HAQAA2 dissemination projects would be 
made available on the HAQAA website and be accessible to the public as an outcome of the knowledge production 
and knowledge sharing of this exceptionally successful international and continental collaborative initiative that has 
had a high impact on building capacity on EQA and IQA in the higher education sector in Africa. 



Report on the Dissemination 
Projects of HAQAA2

Part B:

Report On The Dissemination Projects Of Haqaa2 In 
Francophone Countries By Mr. Emile Zambo Assembe  Naidoo



Table of contents

1. Overview of the dissemination projects ............................................................................................... 27

1.1 Burkina Faso .................................................................................................................................... 27

1.2 Burundi  ........................................................................................................................................... 27

1.3 Cameroon  ....................................................................................................................................... 28

1.4 Comoros  ......................................................................................................................................... 29

1.5 Madagascar ..................................................................................................................................... 30

1.6 Mali ................................................................................................................................................. 31

1.7 Niger  ............................................................................................................................................... 32

1.8 Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC) ........................................................................................ 33

1. Purpose and research question  ............................................................................................................ 34

2. Theoretical and conceptual considerations  ......................................................................................... 34

3. Methodology ......................................................................................................................................... 34

3.1 Methodological approach  .............................................................................................................. 34

3.2 Sources of the primary and secondary data .................................................................................... 35

3.3 Data analysis levels and approach  .................................................................................................. 35

4. Contextual analysis by country of the HAQAA2 dissemination and capacity development projects.  35

5. General considerations regarding the project ...................................................................................... 40

5.1. Coherence of the overall dissemination project with relation to points of reference. .................. 40

5.2. The various points of convergence of the project in the perception of the coordinators and secondary 
sources  ................................................................................................................................................. 42

6. Discursive conclusion  ............................................................................................................................ 44

7.Assessments and Recommendations  .................................................................................................... 46

7.1. Assessments and recommendations of the coordinators .............................................................. 46

7.2. Expert recommendations  .............................................................................................................. 47

APPENDIX ................................................................................................................................................... 48



27

1. Overview of the dissemination projects

This section presents an overview of the projects carried out by country, highlighting the project context or 
initial problem, the objectives of the activities held and the overall aims. The outcomes achieved by each 
project are summarised in a box at the end of each project description. 

1.1 Burkina Faso

The HAQAA2 dissemination and skills- and capacity-building project in Burkina Faso was hosted by Nazi BONI 
University (UNB) in Bobo-Dioulasso and coordinated by Dr Seydou Golo BARRO. The project context highlights, 
within the education sector, an enormous increase in numbers at variance with a limited number of places 
and limited resources. In the absence of an autonomous, independent national structure dedicated to quality 
assurance, the intention was to address this problem through the dissemination and skills- and capacity-building 
project within the framework of the HAQAA2 initiative. To this end, the overall aim of the project was to promote 
the African Standards and Guidelines (ASG) with a view to the institutional accreditation of the UNB and to establish 
a national structure for quality assurance in Burkina Faso. The first specific objective was to improve the skills and 
capacities of the UNB personnel with a view to preparing for the institutional accreditation of the university. The 
second specific objective was to bring to the attention of the higher education authorities in Burkina Faso (the 
ministry, the universities…) the need to establish an autonomous national quality assurance structure.

In order to achieve these objectives, four actions were planned: the organisation of a workshop on the 
adoption of the ASG-QA by Nazi BONI University’s quality assurance hubs; the organisation of a workshop 
on the implementation of the plan to improve self-assessment divergence drawn up by the UNB in 2020; 
the organisation of an ASG-AQ awareness activity; and advocating to the higher education and research 
institution (HERI) leadership the need to establish a national quality assurance structure. 

Box 1: Outcomes achieved in Burkina Faso

Three outcomes were achieved: 
1. The skills and capacities of HERI managers were improved in the field of African quality assurance norms 
and standards; 

2. In preparation for the UNB’s accreditation, the self-assessment recommendations were implemented 
with the aid of the ASG tool; 

3. The authorities have been made aware of the need for a national quality assurance structure.

1.2 Burundi 

The project Using the ASG-QA to Improve Quality Procedures at the University of Burundi was coordinated 
by Professor Jean Chrysostome NDAMANISHA and hosted by the University of Burundi (UB). The context out 



28

of which this project emerged was the implementation of a quality culture promoted by both the African 
Union and the Burundian education authorities. The overall aim was to foster understanding of the ASG-QA 
and to harmonise them with the national minimum norms as applied at the University of Burundi. Specifically, 
the project was aimed at imparting a proper understanding of the ASG-QA to those concerned at the 
University of Burundi, at comparing the University of Burundi’s benchmarks with the ASG-QA, at performing 
an institutional audit of the University of Burundi using the ASG-QA and at harmonising the University of 
Burundi’s quality benchmarks with the ASG-QA. 

To this end a number of activities were selected, namely the identification of the quality assurance hubs (in 
every faculty and management office of the UB); the creation of a group comprising the quality assurance hubs; 
explaining the ASG-QA to the quality assurance hubs; a comparison by the quality assurance hubs of the ASG-
QA and the benchmarks used by the UB; explaining the ASG-QA to the heads of the administrative services, 
the executive assistants and the unit heads; explaining the ASG-QA to the deans and the heads of the masters 
programmes and research centres; where necessary the harmonisation by the quality assurance hubs of the 
ASG-QA with the benchmarks employed by the UB; the conducting by the quality assurance hubs of an internal 
quality assurance audit using the ASG-QA; the production by the quality assurance hubs of an internal audit 
report and the organisation of a workshop at which the results of the audit were to be presented. 

Box 2: Outcomes achieved in Burundi

Six outcomes were achieved: 
1. Quality assurance hubs were established in all the faculties and institutes of the University of Burundi; 

2. The ASG-QA were adopted by the quality assurance hubs of the University of Burundi; 

3. The ASG-QA were adopted by heads of the administrative and technical services of the University of Burundi; 

4. The ASG-QA were adopted by the deans and the heads of the masters programmes of the University of Burundi; 

5. The ASG-QA were used in a quality assurance audit at the University of Burundi;

6. An internal quality assurance audit report was produced in conformity with the ASG-QA.

1.3 Cameroon 

Held jointly in Cameroon and Chad, the project Building Quality Assurance Skills and Capacities among 
Higher Education Personnel was coordinated by Professor Jean Baptiste BIKE MBAH of the University of 
Ngaoundéré in Cameroon. This project emerged out of the context of an increase in social requirements in 
conjunction with developing needs within the higher education sector. The aim was to improve the quality 
and harmonisation of higher education in Africa and to support the employability and mobility of students 
across the continent. The specific objectives were to promote a quality assurance culture within the higher 
education establishments and institutions of Cameroon and Chad; to build skills and capacities among higher 
education personnel in the implementation of the ASG-QA and PAQAF as harmonisation and accreditation 
tools; and to promote the development of harmonised quality assurance mechanisms. 



29

In order to achieve this, the project comprised four phases. The initial phase, dedicated to training, was 
carried out at an institutional level (University of Ngaoundéré) and involved working with the university’s 
various departments (National School of Agro-Industrial Sciences, University Institute of Technology, Faculty 
of Science, Faculty of Arts, Letters and Human Sciences, Faculty of Law and Political Sciences, Faculty of 
Economic Science and Management, École Normale Supérieure, School of Geology and Mining Engineering, 
School of Chemical Engineering and Mineral Industries, Faculty of Medicine and Biomedical Sciences, School 
of Science and Veterinary Medicine, Faculty of Education). The second phase was carried out at a national 
level and involved working with a number of Cameroonian universities (University of Ngaoundéré, University 
of Maroua, University of Yaoundé I, University of Bamenda and University of Dschang). The third phase took 
place at sub-regional level and in addition to the Cameroonian universities mentioned under the second 
phase, included the universities of N’Djamena, Saar and Abéché in Chad. The fourth phase brought together 
all the participants at institutional, national and sub-regional level. The map of participating bodies comprises 
the universities of Ngaoundéré, Yaoundé I, Bamenda, Dschang and Maroua in Cameroon and N’Djamena, 
Saar and Abéché in Chad. 

Box 3: Outcomes achieved in Cameroon 

Three outcomes were achieved: 
1. The participants were familiarised with the higher educational landscape in Africa and with harmonisation 
and evaluation tools such as PAQAF, ASG-QA, AQRM etc.; 

2. The contextualisation skills of regional and international QA managers were developed;

3. Awareness was increased of the current QA situation in Africa (shared challenges and needs)

1.4 Comoros 

The project Creation of a Quality Assurance Department at the University of Comoros was led by Dr Soulé 
Hamidou Hamada, dean of the Faculty of Science and Technology, UDC. The context from which it emerged 
was characterised by the adoption of quality procedures by the Union of the Comoros. The main aim was 
to train a group of UDC managers in quality procedures in relation to education. Specifically, the project was 
aimed at forming a core of expertise in the field of quality assurance and to engage the university in a more 
global approach to quality assurance. 

To this end, four activities were undertaken: the organisation of a workshop aimed at raising awareness of the 
different quality assurance structures; the organisation of a workshop aimed at training those concerned in the 
adoption of quality assurance; spreading the message in the national press as well as among the stakeholders 
concerning the importance of the UDC quality assurance unit; and the organisation of a signing ceremony 
marking the decision to establish a Quality Assurance Department. The target groups were the Ministry of 
National Education and the Central Administration of the UDC along with its departments and partners.



30

Box 4: Outcomes achieved in Comoros 

Four outcomes were achieved: 
1. The various bodies concerned (the Ministry of National Education, the Central Administration of the UDC 
and the UDC’s departments) were familiarised with quality assurance procedures; 

2. Internal and external personnel were trained in quality assurance with regard to education, research, 
organisation, management and evaluation;

3. The importance of the internal QA unit and understanding of its role were promoted, not least through 
the organisation of surveys;

4. An internal quality assurance unit was established at the University of Comoros under decision no. 22-
010/UDC/ADM/CAB/CJ.

1.5 Madagascar

The title of the project held by the University of Toliara in Madagascar is The Development of a Quality 
Culture in Madagascar’s Higher Education Institutions (HEIs) through the Adoption of the ASG-QA for the 
Establishment of Quality Assurance and Accreditation Systems. The project coordinators were Professor 
Hanitra Sylvia ANDRIAMAMPIANINA, Vice-Chancellor of the University of Toliara, and RAZAFINTSALAMA 
VAHINALAHAJA, Associate Director of Research and Director of Research and Innovation at the Ministry of 
Higher Education and Scientific Research (MESUPRES). This project arose out of the context of an alarming 
economic situation in Madagascar. The Madagascan state has been working on the development of innovative 
administration and management policies for a number of years. This innovation is based on the Initiative 
for the Emergence of Madagascar (IEM) and the desire for a high-quality higher education system against 
the background of the Madagascan policy of education for all. The general aim of the project was to help 
Madagascar’s HEIs, through the dissemination and multiplication of the results of the HAQAA2 training 
activities and by establishing quality assurance and accreditation systems based on ASG-QA, to acquire the 
necessary skills and capacities to realise their mission of instituting a higher education system to the benefit 
of national development. 

The project had five specific objectives: (1) to foster awareness among HEI leaders, senior educational staff 
and stakeholders in the main public universities of the need for general understanding and adoption of the 
ASG-QA benchmarks and guidelines concerning quality assurance in higher education; (2) to foster awareness 
among HEI leaders, senior educational staff and stakeholders in the main public universities of the need for 
general understanding and adoption of the ASG-QA benchmarks and guidelines concerning quality assurance 
in higher education; (3) to establish an inter-university quality assurance consortium affiliated with the HAQAA 
(represented by its ambassadors) in order to implement the outcomes of the HAQAA2 training activities; (4) 
to foster a quality culture by formalising the implementation of the continental norms promulgated by the 
ASG-QA; and (5) to draw up a quality framework document with a view to reforming the existing norms 
and frameworks as stipulated by the regulatory texts in force in Madagascar, taking into consideration the 
quality assurance benchmarks and quality guidelines developed by the ASG-QA. The achievement of these 



31

objectives is based on three activities: a workshop marking the launch of the project; an audit of the state of 
internal quality assurance within the HEIs; and a workshop aimed at the dissemination of the ASG-AQ. The 
target groups consisted of stakeholders drawn from MESUPRES and six public universities: ● the University of 
Toliara ● the University of Fianarantsoa ● the University of Antananarivo ● the University of Toamasina ● the 
University of Mahajanga and ● the University of Antsiranana (UNA). 

Box 5: Outcomes achieved in Madagascar 

Five outcomes were achieved: 
1. The university leaders, senior educational staff and external stakeholders were made aware of 
the need for understanding and adoption of the ASG-QA; 

2. Teamwork was established among the main HEIs; 

3. The Inter-university Consortium, led by the HAQAA ambassadors, was established; 

4. The quality assurance norms have entered into force within Madagascar’s public universities; 

5. The quality benchmark document has been published, formally approved and distributed. 

1.6 Mali

The project hosted in Mali, coordinated by Dr Solomani Coulibaly of the Abderrahmane Baba Touré National 
School of Engineering (ENI-ABT) and Dr Fatoumata Keita of the University of Arts and Humanities (ULSHB), 
both in Bamako, was The ASG-QA as a Tool for the Implementation of a Policy of Internal Quality Assurance 
in Mali’s Institutions of Higher Education. The context out of which this project emerged was the disparity 
between quality assurance initiatives and their effective implementation. The overall aim consisted in 
developing and reinforcing internal quality assurance skills in the HEIs via the introduction of the ASG-QA 
and PAQAF, which constitute a package of benchmarks and guidelines for the introduction of good practice in 
matters of quality assurance while complementing the existing practices. 

This project breaks down into five specific objectives: spreading the message about the ASG-QA and 
encouraging their use by the HEIs; making the ASG-QA a barometer of quality within Mali’s HEIs; employing 
the ASG-QA as a tool for self-assessment in matters of internal quality assurance; assisting with the creation 
of internal quality assurance committees (IQACs) by those HEIs still without one; and supporting the process 
of making existing IQACs operational. Ten or so activities were necessary: a launch workshop with video 
conference; initial contact with, and inviting of, the eventual participants in the activities; a workshop for the 
training and improving of quality assurance and ASG-QA/PAQAF skills and capacities among the teaching and 
administrative staff; an institutional self-evaluation by ENI-ABT; a seminar on the ASG-QA and the national 
institutional evaluation benchmark highlighting shared experiences and differences; the drafting of the final 
report; the distribution of the final report and the publication of an article on the experience gained from the 
ASG-QA implementation. The project’s target groups were the teaching and administrative personnel. 



32

Box 6: Outcomes achieved in Mali

Six outcomes were achieved: 
1. Around a hundred participants were trained in using the ASG-QA in HEIs in Mali; 

2. Use of the ASG-QA in periodic self-assessment by the HEIs is effective;

3. A self-assessment report was produced;

 4. A better knowledge and understanding of the ASG-QA was achieved; 

5. Successful collection and analysis of the data in the article on the experience gained from the ASG-QA 
implementation;

6. The quality culture in the HEIs was reinforced  

1.7 Niger 

The project carried out in Niger was Building Quality Assurance Capacity at the Universities of Niamey 
and Tahoua. It was coordinated by Professor Haoua SEINI SABO of Abdou Moumouni University in Niamey 
and Dr Abdoulaye HAMADOU of the University of Tahoua, and emerged against the background of the 
demand for international harmonisation of quality assurance practices within the higher education 
sector. Its main aims were to raise awareness of quality assurance and its requirements at the Ministry of 
Higher Education and among the faculties’ administrative and technical staff, members of the IQACs and 
CellAQ, the teacher-researchers and the student representatives; to develop the skills and abilities of 
the members of the internal units and CellAQ in the evaluation of course programmes; and to promote 
the adoption of the course programme evaluation framework of the African and Malagasy Council for 
Higher Education (CAMES). 

The specific objectives were to deepen their knowledge of quality assurance; to contribute to 
the implementation of quality assurance within their respective institutions; to adopt the CAMES 
framework for the evaluation of course programmes; and to prepare participants for the evaluation 
of course programmes within their respective entities. These objectives were to be realised through a 
series of workshops designed to improve skills and capacities among all quality assurance personnel at 
both ministerial and university level. The project’s target groups were representatives of the ministry 
responsible for higher education, the teacher-researchers, the administrative and technical staff of 
the designated faculties, members of the university quality assurance unit (CellAQ), members of the 
faculties’ internal quality assurance units (IQACs), the heads of department, the subject coordinators 
and the student representatives (course delegates).



33

Box 7: Outcomes achieved in Niger

Four outcomes were achieved: 
1. The participants were made aware of quality assurance within higher education; 

2. The participants were provided with quality assurance tools suitable for a higher education 
context; 

3. Participants were provided with the necessary skills to use the framework for the evaluation of 
course programmes; 

4. Participants were trained to evaluate course programmes within their respective entities.

1.8 Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC)

The HAQAA2 dissemination project held by the National Agency for Quality Assurance in the Higher 
Education and University Sector (ANAQ-ESU) in the DRC arose out of a context of skills and capacities 
development in quality assurance at both African and national level. The DRC belongs to a number of 
quality assurance associations, in particular CAMES (a francophone platform) and SARUA (the platform 
of the SADC nations with a majority of anglophone countries), while various institutions are members 
of other associations as well, such as Assunicam (the association of Catholic universities and institutes 
of Africa and Madagascar). Moreover, each of these associations has its own quality frameworks, with 
the result that the DRC’s universities and higher education institutions face an embarrassment of riches. 
Harmonisation of the guidelines at a pan-African level is a genuine need that the HAQAA2 project was 
able to address.

The main aim of this project was the transfer of internal and external QA knowledge and skills through 
the dissemination of the Pan-African Quality Assurance and Accreditation Framework (PAQAF) and the 
African Standards and Guidelines – Quality Assurance (ASG-QA) within the higher educational landscape 
of the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC). To this end, activities were carried out in three phases. 
The first focused on theoretical training in the key concepts of quality assurance. The second was more 
practical, involving the concrete implementation of the ASG-QA on the basis of pilot institutional self-
assessments carried out in three institutions drawn from the ten that participated in the theoretical 
training. The third, somewhere between theory and practice, was oriented towards benchmarking. 
The project’s target groups were the managers of the internal quality assurance units, members of the 
steering committees, the top management of the institutions (vice-chancellor, chief education officer, 
chief executive officer and deputies) and the students and population of the provinces of Lualaba, Haut-
Lomami, Tanganyika, Maniema and Kasaï-Central. 



34

Box 8: Outcomes achieved in the DRC

Three outcomes were anticipated: 
 1. The drafting of institutional self-assessment reports by the educational establishments based 
on frameworks inspired by the ASG-QA; 

2. The benchmarking report by the ANAQ-ESU has come into effect; 

3. It is planned that the presentations will be made available in PowerPoint.

1. Purpose and research question 

The purpose of this report is to provide an overview of the realisation and impact of the HAQAA2 dissemination 
and skills and capacities development project. For heuristic reasons, we intend on the one hand to explain 
the results achieved and on the other to compare these results with the aims of the initial reference project. 
Moreover, once processed, the information obtained is to serve as the basis for recommendations for 
future action. What was the context within which the HAQAA2 dissemination and skills and capacities 
development project was realised? This is the research question examined – in substance – in this report.

2. Theoretical and conceptual considerations 

Here, we wish on the one hand to invoke the skills-based approach of Gibbens (1984) and Sens (2009) and 
on the other the stakeholder concept. A skills-based approach in conjunction with the stakeholder concept 
enables us to understand the behaviour around a project of those involved. In doing so, it allows a light to be 
shed on the ability of the stakeholders to overcome certain obstacles to be determined and to highlight the 
elements of success or failure of the project. In fact, certain contexts (certain countries) can foster or inhibit 
the possibility of becoming a stakeholder. This theoretical, methodological and teleological apparatus has 
contributed to the formulation of the following specific questions: What are the main issues? What are the 
main challenges? What are the success factors? Did the project produce the anticipated result? What were 
the main outcomes? What can be improved?

3. Methodology 

3.1 Methodological approach 

In order to answer these questions, we have adopted a holistic-inductive approach. This approach is based on a 
study involving multiple cases. Thus, with regard to the different contexts, the cases correspond to each of the eight 
countries selected to host the project. In our analysis of the execution of the different projects by country, we are 
not starting from a pre-established reality; the reality is revealed on contact with the terrain. It is this that justifies 
an induction-based argument. Furthermore, this reality relates back to factual rather than imagined elements. 



35

3.2 Sources of the primary and secondary data

Given these conditions, this part of the report is based on collated data. This data is drawn from at least 
four sources: (S1) – activity reports of the national projects describing the implementation of the selected 
projects; (S2) – the online questions relating to the final reports; (S3) the survey reports; (S4) – the verbatim 
reports of the semi-structured interviews carried out with each coordinating country. In fact, the primary data 
has been obtained from a semi-structured guide and the interviews are organised either individually or, in 
cases where a project involved several parties, in a group. Accordingly, three individual interviews and four 
group discussions were conducted. Despite certain flaws, the aim behind them was to arrive at an empirical, 
lived reality on the part of the coordinators, one removed from mere imagination. 

3.3 Data analysis levels and approach 

Within the framework of this study, analysis was conducted on two levels. The first level of analysis helps us to 
answer the specific questions relating to the context of each country. From this perspective, the information 
collected is the object of processing based on discourse analysis. This choice of analysis enables us firstly to 
emphasise elements that reappear in one form or another, those that are absent, those that are repeated, 
and those that recur in the execution of the projects. In this sense, it enables us to carry out a comparative 
analysis of the implicit, explicit or empty discourse arising out of the different implementation contexts of the 
projects. To this end, we needed to turn to an interactional method of analysis in order to highlight the stakes 
and challenges of the projects: the desired and undesired outcomes, the positive and negative aspects, the 
good and bad points and so on. 

The second level of analysis enables us to then examine the dissemination project in a holistic way. This 
involves pairing the discourse analysis with an analysis of the secondary sources such as the call for proposals 
for the DAAD project, the survey reports and the final reports of the various projects. This analysis brings out 
general considerations relating to the dissemination project, highlighting project coherence, the factors for 
success, the risks and the recommendations.

We opted for a restitutive and analytical approach. Restitutive because it was a question of faithfully reporting 
the words of the coordinators. Regarding the analytical approach, we worked with the secondary sources and 
highlighted the responses of the participants in the survey, extricating the meaning in an inductive manner 
in order to propose the second level of recommendations. The first level being set aside for the coordinators’ 
recommendations emerging from the interviews and concluding reports. 

4. Contextual analysis by country of the HAQAA2 dissemination and capacity 
development projects. 

In order to analyse the context of each project, from the interviews and final reports we extracted key 
benchmarks (concepts) conveyed in the subsidiary research questions including motivation, the challenges, 
the stakes, the success factors and so on as a prelude to coding them. These codes were drawn up on the basis 



36

of an iterative approach.1 In light of our aims, we opted for a comparative analysis of certain key elements in 
this section (Table 1).  

Seizing the opportunity offered by the HAQAA2 dissemination and capacity-building project was one of the 
motivating elements behind the organising of QA activities (Country 1, Country 2, Country 6, Country 8). The 
coordinators reaffirm that their specific objectives were appropriate to the national context. Institutional 
instability and resource change (Country 1, Country 6), resistance to change on the part of internal personnel 
(Country 2, Country 3, Country 4, Country 6) and the need to satisfy a strong demand (Country 1, Country 2, 
Country 3, Country 4, Country 5, Country 6, Country 7, Country 8) seem to be the main challenges overcome 
by the different countries. Possible gains associated with the project are: involvement of personnel in the 
process of continued improvement (Country 1, Country 3), the establishing of a national network of HE 
personnel in the field of QA (Country 1, Country 3), the facilitating and fostering of academic mobility (Country 
3). While the alignment of the ASG with the national or regional framework remains a benefit (Country 8, 
Country 6, Country 2), it is seen by those concerned as duplication or a loss of sovereignty (Country 8). 
Administrative burdens (Country 1, Country 6), in particular the transfer of funds and resistance on the part 
of major institutions (Country 8), seem to have slowed down implementation of the project. Beneficiaries 
favoured quantitative evaluations of their activities (Country 2, Country 4, Country 8).

1. Mukamurera, J., Lacourse, F. et Couturier, Y. (2022). “Des avancées en analyse qualitative: pour une transparence et une systéma-
tisation des pratiques”, Recherches qualitatives, vol. 26, no. 1, 110–38.



37

Table 1: Comparison of aspects of the national projects based on interviews
Country 1 Country 2 Country 3 Country 4 Country 5 Country 6 Country 8 

Motivation - seizing the 
opportunity 

- integrating 
RANAFAQ

-

- the 
HAQAA2 
initiative,

- embryonic 
QA system

- problems of 
academic level 
equivalence 
between the 
students of 
two
neighbouring 
countries

- training and 
improving 
of skills and 
capacities in 
the field of 
harmonisation 
of educational 
curricula 

- new university

- aiming for
autonomy

- significant
increase in 
numbers 

-researching a 
framework

- internationali-
sation (alignment 
with other 
universities)

- creation of a QA 
unit

- university 
turnaround

- reviewing the 
quality frame-
work (harmoni-
sation)

- strengths and 
weaknesses

- gathering data 
on good practice 

- seizing the 
opportunity 
presented by 
DAAD 

- developing 
quality culture 

- the IQACs are 
undergoing 
implementation 
difficulties 

- the need to 
raise awareness 
among staff and 
colleagues (de-
mocratisation)

- training a maxi-
mum number of 
people

- information 
deficit,

- units not 
functional 

- developing QA 
skills

- sharing theo-
retical ASG-QA 
training

- application of 
ASG-QA (compar-
ison)

-

Potential 
risks and 
benefits of 
the adopted 
solution 

- consolidating 
the knowledge 
gained by the 
hubs

- framework 
integrating the 
ASG and CAMES

- signing up to 
the process 
of continued 
improvement

- establishing a 
network of HE 
personnel

- more benefits 

- facilitation of 
qualification 
compatibility

- improving 
employment 
training

- facilitation 
and fostering 
academic 
mobility

- implementing 
AU vision in 
the field of QA

- quality of
resources

- - alignment of 
the ASG and 
framework

- financial 
resources for 
awareness 
-raising 

- the project 
has re-invigo-
rated relations 
between the 
agency and the 
university 

- awareness-
raising 

- greater 
openness in the 
choice of partic-
ipants

- adoption of a 
new framework 
(conflict)

- realisation of 
the importance of 
self-assessments

- enrichment 
of the national 
framework 



38

Challenges 
overcome 

- resource 
change and 
instability

- advocating the 
establishment 
of an agency 

-

- resistance 
to change on 
the part of 
the teaching 
staff

- the short 
time frame 
of the proj-
ect 

- spreading 
understanding 
of the role of 
QA manager

- convincing 
stakeholders of 
the importance 
of QA

- convincing se-
nior staff to get 
involved in the 
project imple-
mentation

- ministry ac-
ceptance of the 
project objectives

- alignment of the 
project with uni-
versity strategy

- context of the 
elections 

- bringing the 
public universi-
ties together 

- forming a 
national consor-
tium (federating 
the six univer-
sities around a 
project) 

- mobility within 
the ambassa-
dors’ countries

- raising aware-
ness among 
stakeholders

 - lack of partici-
pation of stake-
holders in the 
surveys

- mistrust of the 
interviews 

- ability to adapt

- a strong demand 
needing to be 
satisfied 

- mobility of the 
teams 

- QA induction 
training

- non-represen-
tative sample for 
benchmarking

Catalysts in 
the imple-
mentation 
of the 
outcomes 

 

- ministry com-
mitment to 
proliferation 

- mobilisation 
of personnel 
(hubs)

- leadership and 
commitment 
of the man-
agement team 
(former team)

- flexibility of 
the project 

- availability of 
the top manag-
er of the DAAD 
project

- involve-
ment of the 
management

- the support 
of HAQAA

- support 
from the 
experts 

- the drive of 
the ambassa-
dors

- good aware-
ness-raising 

- training tem-
plate proposed 
by HAQAA2 
(training mod-
el)

 

- the support of 
DAAD

- establishing 
a unit acts as a 
stimulus 

-

- recognition of 
authority by the 
Council of Min-
isters

- involvement of 
the vice-chan-
cellors 

- involvement 
of the HAQAA 
ambassadors

- incorporation 
of the frame-
works

- coordination 

- interest of the 
stakeholders 
in QA

- good involve-
ment of staff 

- integration of 
the agency 

- external sup-
port 

- the project has 
been supported 
by the agency 

- experienced 
facilitators

- the willpower of 
the leadership

-

Factors 
inhibiting 
the imple-
mentation 
of the 
outcomes 

- financial 
resources 

- short time 
frames

- availability of 
personnel (in-
stability)

-

- difficulties in 
the releasing of 
funds 

- administrative 
difficulties

- mid-term 
report 

- rapid dis-
bursement of 
funds 

- nothing to re-
port

- delays in receiv-
ing funds 

- nothing to 
report

- the local 
context 

- slowness of the 
release of funds 
(administrative 
difficulties) and 
the consequenc-
es of the delays 

- resource 
change 

- financing delay 
(project delay)

- resistance from 
certain institu-
tions (big institu-
tions)

- new institutions 
more approach-
able 



39

Awareness 
-raising 
factors 

- creation of a 
project team

- vertical and 
horizontal 
awareness-rais-
ing 

- WhatsApp 
group 

- banners 

- media 
coverage

- aware-
ness-raising 
by video; 
YouTube, so-
cial network 

- targeted 
choice of 
participants 

- formal 
invitation by 
chief educa-
tion officer

- radio an-
nouncements 

- sending of 
invitations

- creation of 
banners and 
handouts 

- choice of 
focal points 

- participation 
of manage-
ment 

- door-to-door 

- coming together 
in workshops 

- the departments 

- flyers

- the media

- the teaching 
staff 

- ministry agents

- extending to 
other institutions 
and discussing 
with the students

- increasing the 
scale

- using expert ex-
ternal consultants 
to get messages 
across 

- official ministry 
communication

- door-to-door 

- involving the 
vice-chancellors 

- the university 
sites

- college and 
teacher re-
unions 

- institutional 
communication

- selection of 
quality frame-
works

- general meet-
ing of students

- apprising 
partners 

- communica-
tion between 
vice-chancellors 

- creation of a 
dynamic team 

- department 
and university 
WhatsApp

- targeted invi-
tations

- accessibility 
difficulties 

- flyers 

- banners 

- partnership 
with agency

- vertical aware-
ness-raising (com-
munication)

- presence of 
agency

- selection based 
on stakeholder 
interest 

- (involvement 
of other players, 
chief education 
officer’s confer-
ences…)

- presence of 
an international 
expert



40

5. General considerations regarding the project 

This section takes into account the perception of the coordinators and content analysis of the 
countries’ final reports. It highlights firstly the coherence of the project as a whole in the light of 
points of reference in the call for proposals; secondly the convergence points, underlining the issues, 
challenges, success factors and risks of the project. 

5.1. Coherence of the overall dissemination project with relation to points of reference. 

The coherence of the dissemination project is considered on the basis of specific points of reference. 
It is a question here of checking whether the objectives of the selected projects are aligned with 
those of the HAQAA2 dissemination project. Thus the aim of the latter represents the point of 
reference or benchmark objective. Accordingly, one of the objectives of the dissemination project 
was to encourage collaboration between all the HAQAA (1 and 2) graduates and the quality assurance 
personnel, both internally and externally. In this respect, 60% of the projects were approved on the 
basis of the instigation of a fruitful collaboration between the graduates of the HAQAA1 et HAQAA2 
training courses. On top of this comes the strong involvement of the agencies (Country 5, Country 6, 
Country 8) and senior levels in the ministries of higher education in the awareness-raising and training 
activities (Country 1, Country 3, Country 4). 

The call for dissemination project proposals described 7 topics and 4 activities that could be selected 
(Table 2). During project implementation, 57% of the proposed topics were covered. Within this 
framework 5/8 countries (5 countries out of a total of 8) opted for “The ASG-QA as a tool of institutional 
self-assessment/preparation for accreditation”, 5/8 countries chose “Development of a quality culture 
in the universities and systems”, 1/8 countries selected “The ASG-QA as a tool for the creation of 
national QA systems in conformity with the c